Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-313
Records and information; use and disclosure; limitations.

It shall be unlawful, except as permitted by section 68-313.01 and except for purposes directly connected with the administration of general assistance, medically handicapped children's services, medical assistance, assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled, or aid to dependent children, and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services, for any person or persons to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any list of or names of, any information concerning, or persons applying for or receiving such aid or assistance, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state, or subdivisions or agencies thereof, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

Laws 1941, c. 174, § 3, p. 684;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-340;

R.S.1943, § 68-313;

Laws 1953, c. 234, § 1(1), p. 813;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 30;

Laws 1985, LB 249, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 296;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 241.

Read together, this section and section 68-313.01 prohibit the use of welfare-related information as evidence against a welfare applicant in a criminal trial not directly connected with the administration of general assistance. State v. Owen, 1 Neb. App. 1060, 510 N.W.2d 503 (1993).